Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4002.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 173.130 is amended to read:
173.130. (1)(a) The Legislative Counsel shall prepare or assist in the preparation of legislative
measures when requested to do so by a member or committee of the Legislative Assembly.
(b)(A) A member of the Legislative Assembly may not ask the Legislative Counsel to
prepare more than 25 legislative measures for a regular session of the Legislative Assembly
that begins in an odd-numbered year.
(B) A committee of the Legislative Assembly may not ask the Legislative Counsel to
prepare more than 15 legislative measures for a regular session of the Legislative Assembly
that begins in an odd-numbered year.
(c) The limitations of paragraph (b) of this subsection do not apply to the Joint Com-
mittee on Ways and Means.
(2)(a) Upon the written request of a state agency, the Legislative Counsel may prepare or assist
in the preparation of legislative measures that have been approved for preparation in writing by the
Governor or the Governor’s designated representative. The Legislative Counsel may also prepare
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 230

HB 4002
or assist in the preparation of legislative measures that are requested in writing by the Judicial
Department, the Governor, the Secretary of State, the State Treasurer, the Attorney General or the
Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries. In accordance with ORS 283.110, the Legisla-
tive Counsel may charge the agency or officer for the services performed.
(b)(A) The Governor and state agencies may not ask the Legislative Counsel to prepare
more than a combined total of 200 legislative measures for a regular session of the Legisla-
tive Assembly that begins in an odd-numbered year.
(B) The limit imposed by this paragraph does not include legislative measures requested
by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services to implement the fiscal recommen-
dations of the Governor contained in the budget report of the Governor.
(C) As used in this subsection and subsection (3) of this section, “state agency” means
a board, commission, department, division, office or other entity of the executive depart-
ment, as that term is defined in ORS 174.112, but does not include a state agency subject to
paragraph (c) or (d) of this subsection.
(c)(A) The Secretary of State may not ask the Legislative Counsel to prepare more than
15 legislative measures for a regular session of the Legislative Assembly that begins in an
odd-numbered year.
(B) The State Treasurer may not ask the Legislative Counsel to prepare more than 15
legislative measures for a regular session of the Legislative Assembly that begins in an
odd-numbered year.
(C) The Attorney General may not ask the Legislative Counsel to prepare more than 15
legislative measures for a regular session of the Legislative Assembly that begins in an
odd-numbered year.
(D) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries may not ask the Legislative
Counsel to prepare more than 15 legislative measures for a regular session of the Legislative
Assembly that begins in an odd-numbered year.
(d) The Judicial Department, as defined in ORS 174.113, may not ask the Legislative
Counsel to prepare more than 15 legislative measures for a regular session of the Legislative
Assembly that begins in an odd-numbered year.
(3) Notwithstanding the limit imposed by subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the Senate
Committee on Rules or the House Committee on Rules may ask the Legislative Counsel to
prepare additional measures on behalf of:
(a) A member or committee of the Legislative Assembly;
(b) The Governor or a state agency under the authority of the Governor;
(c) The Secretary of State;
(d) The State Treasurer;
(e) The Attorney General;
(f) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries; or
(g) The Judicial Department.
(4)(a) When the Senate passes or adopts a Senate measure or when the House of Repre-
sentatives passes or adopts a House measure, the member or committee that requested the
preparation of the measure may ask the Legislative Counsel to prepare another legislative
measure. A measure prepared pursuant to this paragraph is not subject to any introduction
deadline established by Senate rules, House rules or rules of proceeding established by joint
or concurrent resolution.
[2]

HB 4002
(b) A vote on the reconsideration of a measure, a vote to concur in the amendments of
the other legislative chamber or a vote on conference committee amendments does not au-
thorize a requester to request the Legislative Counsel to prepare another legislative meas-
ure.
[(3)] (5) The Legislative Counsel shall give such consideration to and service concerning any
measure or other legislative matter before the Legislative Assembly as is requested by the House
of Representatives, the Senate or any committee of the Legislative Assembly that has the measure
or other matter under consideration.
[(4)] (6) The Legislative Counsel, pursuant to the policies and directions of the Legislative
Counsel Committee and in conformity with any applicable rules of the House of Representatives or
Senate, shall perform or cause to be performed research service requested by any member or com-
mittee of the Legislative Assembly in connection with the performance of legislative functions. Re-
search assignments made by joint or concurrent resolution of the Legislative Assembly shall be
given priority over other research requests received by the Legislative Counsel. The research ser-
vice to be performed includes the administrative services incident to the accomplishment of the re-
search requests or assignments.
[(5)] (7) The Legislative Counsel shall give an opinion in writing upon any question of law in
which the Legislative Assembly or any member or committee of the Legislative Assembly may have
an interest when the Legislative Assembly or any member or committee of the Legislative Assembly
requests the opinion. Except as provided in [subsection (2)] subsections (2) and (3) of this section
and ORS 173.135, the Legislative Counsel shall not give opinions or provide other legal services to
persons or agencies other than the Legislative Assembly and members and committees of the Leg-
islative Assembly.
[(6)] (8) The Legislative Counsel may enter into contracts to carry out the functions of the
Legislative Counsel.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 173.130 by section 1 of this 2026 Act apply to re-
quests for legislative measures for the 2027 regular session of the Legislative Assembly and
to requests for legislative measures for subsequent odd-numbered year regular sessions.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

[3]